Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2106
Garbage disposal plant or system and solid waste disposal area; management and operation; rates and charges; collections; penalties.

When a garbage disposal plant or system or solid waste disposal area shall have been established pursuant to section 19-2101, the municipality may provide by ordinance for the management and operation thereof, the rates to be charged for such service, including collection and disposal, and the manner of payment and collection thereof, prescribe penalties for the violation of such ordinance, and do whatever is necessary to protect the general health in the matter of removal and disposal of garbage.

Laws 1947, c. 54, § 6, p. 184;

Laws 1972, LB 893, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 135.